South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3914.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 62-6-101(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) "Account" means: (a) a contract of deposit between a depositor and a financial institution, and includes a checking account, savings account, certificate of deposit, share account, and other like arrangements; or (b) a patronage capital account of an electric cooperative or a telephone cooperative pursuant to Sections 33-49-460 and 33-46-460. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2025. ----XX----